Utah statutes.
34-38-1.   Legislative findings -- Purpose and intent of chapter.

(1)  The Legislature finds that a healthy and productive work force, safe working conditions free from the effects of drugs and alcohol, and maintenance of the quality of products produced and services rendered in this state, are important to employers, employees, and the general public.  The Legislature further finds that the abuse of drugs and alcohol creates a variety of workplace problems, including increased injuries on the job, increased absenteeism, increased financial burden on health and benefit programs, increased workplace theft, decreased employee morale, decreased productivity, and a decline in the quality of products and services.

(2)  The Legislature does not intend to prohibit an employee from seeking damages or job reinstatement, if action is taken by the employer on the basis of an inaccurate test result.



Amended by Chapter 284, 2010 General Session

